Mississippi statutes. Title 35. War Veterans and Pensions
Chapter 7. Veterans’ Home Purchase Law
§ 35-7-39.
Second purchases of property for veteran.

The intent of this law is to provide a one-time benefit to the veteran, and the board shall not consider applications for the purchase of a second home as long as there are eligible veterans on the waiting list to apply for a first purchase.

If a veteran who has been the beneficiary of this chapter loses his home by fire, windstorm or other insurable hazard beyond his control and his account with the board is paid in full, the board may, in its discretion, approve the purchase of a home for such veteran, subject to all the other provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7518; Laws, 1936, ch. 199; Laws, 1946, ch. 221, § 2; Laws, 1948, ch. 500, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 465, § 2; Laws, 1952, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 351; Laws, 1958, ch. 460, § 1; Laws, 1964, ch. 477; Laws, 1966, ch. 277, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 425, § 15, eff from and after May 1, 1987.

§ 35-7-41.
Rights of surviving spouse.

If a veteran dies after filing his or her application for a home as provided in this chapter, and his or her application is subsequently approved, his or her unremarried spouse may, in the discretion of the board, succeed to his or her rights, privileges and benefits under this law that would have been his or hers but for his or her death. The contract or purchase which the board otherwise would or might have entered into with such veteran may be entered into with his or her unremarried spouse.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7529; Laws, 1936, ch. 199; Laws, 1946, ch. 221, § 19; Laws, 1948, ch. 500, § 17; Laws, 1950, ch. 465, § 17; Laws, 1987, ch. 425, § 16, eff from and after May 1, 1987.

§ 35-7-43.
Removal of disability of minority.

Any citizen of this state, over the age of 18 years and under the age of 21 years, otherwise qualified under the provisions of this chapter and desirous of obtaining the benefits of this chapter, notwithstanding such minority, shall be entitled to avail of the benefits of this chapter, and for so doing the minority of such person is hereby removed to authorize the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7531.7; Laws, 1946, ch. 221, § 23; Laws, 1948, ch. 500, § 22; Laws, 1950, ch. 465, § 23.

§ 35-7-45.
Funds; sale of mortgages; issuance of notes.

Any money previously appropriated to the revolving fund of the board or that may be hereinafter appropriated shall be commingled, exclusive of escrow funds provided for in Section 35-7-31, into a general revolving fund for carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The expense of administering this chapter shall be paid from the revolving fund within the limitations provided by Section 35-7-9. The revolving fund of the board will constitute a trust fund and shall be segregated from all other funds in the State Treasury. All interest earned by the State Treasury on any investment of the Veterans’ Home Purchase Board Revolving Fund shall be placed to the credit of such fund. The State Fiscal Management Board is authorized and directed to draw warrants upon such funds from time to time upon requisition of the board executed by its executive officer, and the State Treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to pay such warrants.

The money repaid by the purchaser shall be deposited in the board’s revolving fund and shall be available under the same conditions as the original appropriation. The board shall have continuing authority to expend funds up to the maximum amount received into the special revolving fund, limited to the discretionary best judgment of the board as to reserve. The board shall submit to the State Fiscal Management Board, the Legislative Budget Office, legislative appropriation committees, and other such authority as may arise or be deemed necessary, an annual budget, using the standard general fund budget format as a model, but modified to reflect an accurate and management-oriented view of the revolving fund, and an annual report reflecting a detailed analysis of all revenue and expenditures. All funds in the revolving fund in excess of the one percent (1%) administrative expense allowance shall be expended or committed for new loans with the exception of the reserve judged necessary by the board.

The board, with the advice and consent of the State Bond Commission, may also sell or hypothecate its mortgage loans to the Reconstruction Finance Corporation of the United States Government or to any subsidiary agency thereof, or to any other agency, private or public, when a sale of such mortgage loans would be to the advantage of the board. However, no mortgage loans may be sold for less than the prevailing market value, which may include sale at a discount from book value when discounted to present value to equate to market yields, of said loans as determined by the State Bond Commission. The provisions of this section may also include the discounting to present value of lower interest rate loans to the mortgagor to encourage early payoff of the loan.

The board may issue its notes in such amounts and for such terms as the board may deem advisable to provide additional funds for purchase of veterans’ homes, and such notes shall be eligible for purchase by any agency of the State of Mississippi. The repayment of such notes shall be guaranteed by the board, and any and all income to the board from the repayments of the principal and interest on its purchases by veterans shall be first pledged to repayment of any maturing notes. The maturity dates, denomination or amount, and rate of interest of such notes shall be determined by the board; however, such notes shall in no event exceed a term of thirty (30) years nor bear a higher rate of interest than one percent (1%) below that received by the board on its mortgages and deeds of trust. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the board may apply the proceeds from the issuance of its notes under this section or the issuance of its bonds under any other applicable law, as follows:

Refinancing of permanent mortgage loans, subject to the conditions specified in Section 35-7-17(5).

Increasing the purchase limit on homes as provided in Section 35-7-17(1).

The board shall have the authority to sell outright its mortgages and deeds of trust at market value, or discounted to present value, as hereinabove provided and to service said mortgages for the purchaser, collecting the principal and interest due the owner of such mortgages, and to charge therefor a reasonable service fee to be mutually agreed upon by the purchaser of such mortgages and the board.

Any notes issued by the board must be approved at a regular meeting of the board, upon favorable vote by a majority of four (4) members of the board, who shall authorize the chairman and the executive director of said board to issue and sign such notes as the official deed and act of the whole board.

Any additional monies appropriated or obtained to extend the benefits of this chapter shall be commingled with and become an integral part of the revolving fund provided by this section, and the method of accounting therefor shall be the same as used with respect to any other monies in the revolving fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7531; Laws, 1936, ch. 199; Laws, 1946, ch. 221, §§ 21, 22; Laws, 1948, ch. 500, §§ 19-21; Laws, 1950, ch. 465, §§ 19-22; Laws, 1952, ch. 311, § 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 353; Laws, 1958, ch. 460, § 7; Laws, 1962, ch. 478, § 4; Laws, 1987, ch. 425, § 17, eff from and after May 1, 1987.

§ 35-7-47.
Special consideration in event of hardship.

This law recognizes the occurrence of extreme and unusual circumstances which create hardship on veteran applicants from time to time; therefore, the board shall have the authority to waive, according to its best judgment, certain provisions, rules and criteria on a case by case basis. Any request for special consideration of hardship shall be fully documented and verified by the board, to include signed statements by the applicant, knowledgeable disinterested third parties, and investigation by an officer or employee of the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 425, § 18, eff from and after May 1, 1987.

§ 35-7-49.
Confidentiality of information obtained in loan processing.

All personal information, including financial and credit information, provided to the board for the purpose of obtaining and servicing a loan, shall be held in strict confidence by the board, and used only by the board and its authorized employees for the purpose of processing and servicing the subject loan. Release of any information on an applicant or borrower outside of the board shall be only by proper legal subpoena or by the written consent of the individual involved. The intent is to protect the privacy of individual citizens/veterans and to provide complete candor in loan processing and related business matters. This section is not intended to apply to communication with the credit and financial community on credit evaluation and loan servicing. Also, it is not intended to prevent the disclosure of information in the process of negotiating a settlement by a third party when a loan is in default or otherwise in violation of this law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 425, § 19, eff from and after May 1, 1987.

§ 35-7-51.
Criminal sanctions for fraudulent conduct.

Any person, seller, veteran, broker, agent, attorney or corporate officer, who shall knowingly make, utter, publish, pass or use any false, fictitious or forged paper, document, contract, affidavit, application, assignment or other instrument in writing in connection with or pertaining to any transaction under this law, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be subject to punishment under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and shall further forfeit any rights to the benefits of this law, and shall repay on demand any funds expended by the board on his or her behalf or otherwise outstanding to the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 425, § 20, eff from and after May 1, 1987.